6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX aA Y 54
SFX aA ller ller/n'q'd'm't' aller po:infi
SFX aA ller llant/n'q'm't' aller po:ppre
SFX aA ller llé/q' aller po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX aA ller llés/q' aller po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX aA ller llée/q' aller po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX aA ller llées/q' aller po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX aA aller vais aller po:ipre po:1sg
SFX aA aller vas aller po:ipre po:2sg
SFX aA aller va aller po:ipre po:3sg
SFX aA ller llons/n'q' aller po:ipre po:1pl
SFX aA ller llez/n'q' aller po:ipre po:2pl
SFX aA aller vont aller po:ipre po:3pl!
SFX aA ller llais/n'q'j' aller po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX aA ller llait/n'q'm't' aller po:iimp po:3sg
SFX aA ller llions/n'q' aller po:iimp po:1pl
SFX aA ller lliez/n'q' aller po:iimp po:2pl
SFX aA ller llaient/n'q'm't' aller po:iimp po:3pl
SFX aA ller llai/n'q'j' aller po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX aA ller llas/n'q' aller po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX aA ller lla/n'q'm't' aller po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX aA ller llâmes/n'q' aller po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX aA ller llâtes/n'q' aller po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX aA ller llèrent/n'q'm't' aller po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX aA aller irai/n'q'j' aller po:ifut po:1sg
SFX aA aller iras/n'q' aller po:ifut po:2sg
SFX aA aller ira/n'q'm't' aller po:ifut po:3sg
SFX aA aller irons/n'q' aller po:ifut po:1pl
SFX aA aller irez/n'q'm't' aller po:ifut po:2pl
SFX aA aller iront/n'q' aller po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX aA aller irais/n'q'j' aller po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX aA aller irait/n'q'm't' aller po:cond po:3sg
SFX aA aller irions/n'q' aller po:cond po:1pl
SFX aA aller iriez/n'q' aller po:cond po:2pl
SFX aA aller iraient/n'q'm't' aller po:cond po:3pl
SFX aA ller ille/n'q'j'm't' aller po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX aA ller illes/n' aller po:spre po:2sg
SFX aA ller llions/n' aller po:spre po:1pl
SFX aA ller lliez/n' aller po:spre po:2pl
SFX aA ller illent/n'q'm't' aller po:spre po:3pl
SFX aA ller llasse/n'q'j' aller po:simp po:1sg
SFX aA ller llasses/n'q' aller po:simp po:2sg
SFX aA ller llât/n'q'm't' aller po:simp po:3sg
SFX aA ller llassions/n'q' aller po:simp po:1pl
SFX aA ller llassiez/n'q' aller po:simp po:2pl
SFX aA ller llassent/n'q'm't' aller po:simp po:3pl
SFX aA ller llons/n' aller po:impe po:1pl
SFX aA aller va aller po:impe po:2sg
SFX aA aller vas-y aller po:impe po:2sg ds:+y
SFX aA aller va-t'en aller po:impe po:2sg ds:+en
SFX aA ller llons-y aller po:impe po:1pl ds:+y
SFX aA ller llons-nous-en aller po:impe po:1pl ds:+en
SFX aA ller llez/n' aller po:impe po:2pl
SFX aA ller llez-y aller po:impe po:2pl ds:+y
SFX aA ller llez-vous-en aller po:impe po:2pl ds:+en
SFX aD Y 44
SFX aD voyer voyer/n'q'd'l'm't's' envoyer po:infi
SFX aD voyer voyant/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:ppre
SFX aD voyer voyé/q' envoyer po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX aD voyer voyés/q' envoyer po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX aD voyer voyée/q' envoyer po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX aD voyer voyées/q' envoyer po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'j'l'm't's' envoyer po:ipre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX aD voyer voies/n'q'l'm't' envoyer po:ipre po:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'q'l't' envoyer po:ipre po:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'q'l'm' envoyer po:ipre po:2pl
SFX aD voyer voient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX aD voyer voyais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:iimp po:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyions/n'q'l't' envoyer po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX aD voyer voyaient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:iimp po:3pl
SFX aD voyer voyai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX aD voyer voyas/n'q'l'm't' envoyer po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX aD voyer voya/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyâmes/n'q'l't' envoyer po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyâtes/n'q'l'm' envoyer po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX aD voyer voyèrent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX aD voyer verrai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX aD voyer verras/n'q'l'm't' envoyer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX aD voyer verra/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX aD voyer verrons/n'q'l't' envoyer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX aD voyer verrez/n'q'l'm' envoyer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX aD voyer verront/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX aD voyer verrais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX aD voyer verrait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:cond po:3sg
SFX aD voyer verrions/n'q'l't' envoyer po:cond po:1pl
SFX aD voyer verriez/n'q'l'm' envoyer po:cond po:2pl
SFX aD voyer verraient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:cond po:3pl
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'j'l'm't's' envoyer po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX aD voyer voies/n'l'm't' envoyer po:spre po:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyasse/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer po:simp po:1sg
SFX aD voyer voyasses/n'q'l'm't' envoyer po:simp po:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyât/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:simp po:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyassions/n'q'l't' envoyer po:simp po:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyassiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer po:simp po:2pl
SFX aD voyer voyassent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer po:simp po:3pl
SFX aD voyer voie/n'l'm't' envoyer po:impe po:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'l' envoyer po:impe po:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'l'm' envoyer po:impe po:2pl
SFX aE Y 6
SFX aE direr direr/n'q'd'l'm't's' direr po:infi
SFX aE direr dirant/n'q'l'm't's' direr po:ppre
SFX aE direr diré/q' direr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX aE direr dirés/q' direr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX aE direr dirée/q' direr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX aE direr dirées/q' direr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX aF N 18
SFX aF cerner cerner er po:infi
SFX aF cerner cernant er po:ppre
SFX aF cerner cerné er po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX aF cerner cernés er po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX aF cerner cernée er po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX aF cerner cernées er po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX aF cerner cerne er po:ipre po:spre po:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernent er po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX aF cerner cernait er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernaient er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX aF cerner cerna er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernèrent er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX aF cerner cernera er po:ifut po:3sg
SFX aF cerner cerneront er po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX aF cerner cernerait er po:cond po:3sg
SFX aF cerner cerneraient er po:cond po:3pl
SFX aF cerner cernât er po:simp po:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernassent er po:simp po:3pl
SFX aG Y 19
SFX aG er er/n'q'd'm't' er po:infi
SFX aG er ant/n'q'm't' er po:ppre
SFX aG mber mbé mber po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX aG lter lté lter po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX aG lter ltés lter po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX aG lter ltée lter po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX aG lter ltées lter po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX aG er e/n'q'm't' er po:ipre po:spre po:3sg
SFX aG er ent/n'q'm't' er po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX aG er ait/n'q'm't' er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX aG er aient/n'q'm't' er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX aG er a/n'q'm't' er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX aG er èrent/n'q'm't' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX aG er era/n'q'm't' er po:ifut po:3sg
SFX aG er eront/n'q'm't' er po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX aG er erait/n'q'm't' er po:cond po:3sg
SFX aG er eraient/n'q'm't' er po:cond po:3pl
SFX aG er ât/n'q'm't' er po:simp po:3sg
SFX aG er assent/n'q'm't' er po:simp po:3pl
